Illinois, session 104th, SB3394.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 28-8 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/28-8)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-8)7    Sec. 28-8. Gambling losses recoverable. 8    (a) Any natural person with residency in the State of 9Illinois who by gambling shall lose to any other person, any 10sum of money or thing of value, amounting to the sum of $50 or 11more and shall pay or deliver the same or any part thereof, may 12sue for and recover the money or other thing of value, so lost 13and paid or delivered, in a civil action against the winner 14thereof, with costs, in the circuit court. No person who 15accepts from another person for transmission, and transmits, 16either in his own name or in the name of such other person, any 17order for any transaction to be made upon, or who executes any 18order given to him by another person, or who executes any 19transaction for his own account on, any regular board of trade 20or commercial, commodity or stock exchange, shall, under any 21circumstances, be deemed a "winner" of any moneys lost by such 22other person in or through any such transactions.23    (b) If within 6 months, such person who under the terms of   SB3394- 2 -LRB104 19516 RLC 32964 b1Subsection 28-8(a) is entitled to initiate action to recover 2his losses does not in fact pursue his remedy, any person may 3initiate a civil action against the winner. The court or the 4jury, as the case may be, shall determine the amount of the 5loss. After such determination, the court shall enter a 6judgment of triple the amount so determined.7    (c) Gambling losses as a result of gambling conducted on a 8video gaming terminal licensed under the Video Gaming Act are 9not recoverable under this Section. 10    (d) Losses as a result of participation in any fantasy 11contests against a fantasy contest operator, including 12single-player fantasy contests, are not recoverable under this 13Section. 14(Source: P.A. 98-31, eff. 6-24-13.) 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.